Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 42.52.010 and 2022 c 173 s 1 and 2022 c 71 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Agency" means any state board, commission, bureau, committee, department, institution, division, or tribunal in the legislative, executive, or judicial branch of state government. "Agency" includes all elective offices, the state legislature, those institutions of higher education created and supported by the state government, and those courts that are parts of state government. "Agency" does not include a comprehensive cancer center participating in a collaborative arrangement as defined in RCW 28B.10.930 that is operated in conformance with RCW 28B.10.930.(2) "Appearance" means the act of performing or participating in an event.(3) "Assist" means to act, or offer or agree to act, in such a way as to help, aid, advise, furnish information to, or otherwise provide assistance to another person, believing that the action is of help, aid, advice, or assistance to the person and with intent so to assist such person.(((3)))(4) "Beneficial interest" ((has the meaning ascribed to it under the Washington case law))means a financial interest in a contract, sale, lease, purchase, or grant to which an individual subject to the act is not a party, but is an owner of an entity that is a party. An ownership interest of less than 10 percent of an entity is not a beneficial interest. However, an ownership interest in a mutual fund or similar investment pooling fund in which the owner has no management powers does not constitute a beneficial interest in the entities in which the fund or pool invests.(((4)))(5) "Charitable association, institution, or organization" means any entity that provides services beneficial to the public to an open class of people.(6) "Civic organization" means a nonprofit group relating to the duties or activities of people in relation to their town, city, or local area.(7) "Community organization" means an organization aimed at making desired improvements to a community's social health, well-being, and overall functioning.(8) "Compensation" means anything of economic value, however designated, that is paid, loaned, granted, or transferred, or to be paid, loaned, granted, or transferred for, or in consideration of, personal services to any person.(((5)))(9) "Confidential information" means (a) specific information, rather than generalized knowledge, that is not available to the general public on request or (b) information made confidential by law.(((6)))(10) "Contract" or "grant" means an agreement between two or more persons that creates an obligation to do or not to do a particular thing. "Contract" or "grant" includes, but is not limited to, an employment contract, a lease, a license, a purchase agreement, or a sales agreement.(((7)))(11) "Emergency" means a serious, unexpected, and often dangerous situation requiring immediate action.(12) "Ethics boards" means the commission on judicial conduct, the legislative ethics board, and the executive ethics board.(((8)))(13) "Extraordinary award" means a national, state, or local award with very few recipients that is sufficiently infrequent to be noteworthy to a reasonable person.(14) "Family" has the same meaning as "immediate family" in RCW 42.17A.005.(((9) "Gift" means anything of economic value for which no consideration is given. "Gift" does not include:(a) Items from family members or friends where it is clear beyond a reasonable doubt that the gift was not made as part of any design to gain or maintain influence in the agency of which the recipient is an officer or employee;(b) Items related to the outside business of the recipient that are customary and not related to the recipient's performance of official duties;(c) Items exchanged among officials and employees or a social event hosted or sponsored by a state officer or state employee for coworkers;(d) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation, appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity. As used in this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging, and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the day after the event;(e) Items a state officer or state employee is authorized by law to accept;(f) Payment of enrollment and course fees and reasonable travel expenses attributable to attending seminars and educational programs sponsored by a bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional, educational, trade, or charitable association or institution. As used in this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging, and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the day after the event;(g) Items returned by the recipient to the donor within thirty days of receipt or donated to a charitable organization within thirty days of receipt;(h) Campaign contributions reported under chapter 42.17A RCW;(i) Discounts available to an individual as a member of an employee group, occupation, or similar broad-based group; and(j) Awards, prizes, scholarships, or other items provided in recognition of academic or scientific achievement.(10)))(15) "Federal holiday" means the legal public holidays provided in 5 U.S.C. Sec. 6103(a), as it existed on the effective date of this section.(16) "Head of agency" means the chief executive officer of an agency. In the case of an agency headed by a commission, board, committee, or other body consisting of more than one natural person, agency head means the person or board authorized to appoint agency employees and regulate their conduct.(((11)))(17) "Honorarium" means money or thing of value offered to a state officer or state employee for a speech, appearance, article, or similar item or activity in connection with the state officer's or state employee's official role.(((12)))(18) "Institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.10.016.(((13)))(19) "Lobbying the legislature" means attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington.(20) "Official duty" means those duties within the specific scope of employment of the state officer or state employee as defined by the officer's or employee's agency or by statute or the state Constitution.(((14)))(21) "Official position" means holding an office or having authority.(22) "Participate" means to participate in state action or a proceeding personally and substantially as a state officer or state employee, through approval, disapproval, decision, recommendation, the rendering of advice, investigation, or otherwise but does not include preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation or the performance of legislative duties.(((15)))(23) "Person" means any individual, partnership, association, corporation, firm, institution, or other entity, whether or not operated for profit.(((16)))(24) "Regulatory agency" means any state board, commission, department, or officer, except those in the legislative or judicial branches, authorized by law to conduct adjudicative proceedings, issue permits or licenses, or to control or affect interests of identified persons.(((17)))(25) "Responsibility" in connection with a transaction involving the state, means the direct administrative or operating authority, whether intermediate or final, and either exercisable alone or through subordinates, effectively to approve, disapprove, or otherwise direct state action in respect of such transaction.(((18)))(26) "State action" means any action on the part of an agency, including, but not limited to:(a) A decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order; and(b) A grant, payment, award, license, contract, transaction, sanction, or approval, or the denial thereof, or failure to act with respect to a decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order.(((19)))(27) "State employee" means an individual who is employed by an agency in any branch of state government. For purposes of this chapter, employees of the superior courts are not state officers or state employees.(((20)))(28) "State officer" means every person holding a position of public trust in or under an executive, legislative, or judicial office of the state. "State officer" includes judges of the superior court, judges of the court of appeals, justices of the supreme court, members of the legislature together with the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives, holders of elective offices in the executive branch of state government, chief executive officers of state agencies, members of boards, commissions, or committees with authority over one or more state agencies or institutions, and employees of the state who are engaged in supervisory, policy-making, or policy-enforcing work. For the purposes of this chapter, "state officer" also includes any person exercising or undertaking to exercise the powers or functions of a state officer.(((21)))(29) "Thing of economic value," in addition to its ordinary meaning, includes:(a) A loan, property interest, interest in a contract or other chose in action, and employment or another arrangement involving a right to compensation;(b) An option, irrespective of the conditions to the exercise of the option; and(c) A promise or undertaking for the present or future delivery or procurement.(((22)))(30)(a) "Transaction involving the state" means a proceeding, application, submission, request for a ruling or other determination, contract, claim, case, or other similar matter that the state officer, state employee, or former state officer or state employee in question believes, or has reason to believe:(i) Is, or will be, the subject of state action; or(ii) Is one to which the state is or will be a party; or(iii) Is one in which the state has a direct and substantial proprietary interest.(b) "Transaction involving the state" does not include the following: Preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation, including appropriation of moneys in a budget, or the performance of legislative duties by an officer or employee; or a claim, case, lawsuit, or similar matter if the officer or employee did not participate in the underlying transaction involving the state that is the basis for the claim, case, or lawsuit.(((23)))(31) "University" includes "state universities" and "regional universities" as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and also includes any research or technology institute affiliated with a university.(((24)))(32) "University research employee" means a state officer or state employee employed by a university, but only to the extent the state officer or state employee is engaged in research, technology transfer, approved consulting activities related to research and technology transfer, or other incidental activities.Sec. 2. RCW 42.52.010 and 2024 c 164 s 513 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Agency" means any state board, commission, bureau, committee, department, institution, division, or tribunal in the legislative, executive, or judicial branch of state government. "Agency" includes all elective offices, the state legislature, those institutions of higher education created and supported by the state government, and those courts that are parts of state government. "Agency" does not include a comprehensive cancer center participating in a collaborative arrangement as defined in RCW 28B.10.930 that is operated in conformance with RCW 28B.10.930.(2) "Appearance" means the act of performing or participating in an event.(3) "Assist" means to act, or offer or agree to act, in such a way as to help, aid, advise, furnish information to, or otherwise provide assistance to another person, believing that the action is of help, aid, advice, or assistance to the person and with intent so to assist such person.(((3)))(4) "Beneficial interest" ((has the meaning ascribed to it under the Washington case law))means a financial interest in a contract, sale, lease, purchase, or grant to which an individual subject to the act is not a party, but is an owner of an entity that is a party. An ownership interest of less than 10 percent of an entity is not a beneficial interest. However, an ownership interest in a mutual fund or similar investment pooling fund in which the owner has no management powers does not constitute a beneficial interest in the entities in which the fund or pool invests.(((4)))"Charitable association, institution, or organization" means any entity that provides services beneficial to the public to an open class of people.(6) "Civic organization" means a nonprofit group relating to the duties or activities of people in relation to their town, city, or local area.(7) "Community organization" means an organization aimed at making desired improvements to a community's social health, well-being, and overall functioning.(8) "Compensation" means anything of economic value, however designated, that is paid, loaned, granted, or transferred, or to be paid, loaned, granted, or transferred for, or in consideration of, personal services to any person.(((5)))(9) "Confidential information" means (a) specific information, rather than generalized knowledge, that is not available to the general public on request or (b) information made confidential by law.(((6)))(10) "Contract" or "grant" means an agreement between two or more persons that creates an obligation to do or not to do a particular thing. "Contract" or "grant" includes, but is not limited to, an employment contract, a lease, a license, a purchase agreement, or a sales agreement.(((7)))(11) "Emergency" means a serious, unexpected, and often dangerous situation requiring immediate action.(12) "Ethics boards" means the commission on judicial conduct, the legislative ethics board, and the executive ethics board.(((8)))(13) "Extraordinary award" means a national, state, or local award with very few recipients that is sufficiently infrequent to be noteworthy to a reasonable person.(14) "Family" has the same meaning as "immediate family" in RCW 29B.10.280.(((9) "Gift" means anything of economic value for which no consideration is given. "Gift" does not include:(a) Items from family members or friends where it is clear beyond a reasonable doubt that the gift was not made as part of any design to gain or maintain influence in the agency of which the recipient is an officer or employee;(b) Items related to the outside business of the recipient that are customary and not related to the recipient's performance of official duties;(c) Items exchanged among officials and employees or a social event hosted or sponsored by a state officer or state employee for coworkers;(d) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation, appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity. As used in this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging, and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the day after the event;(e) Items a state officer or state employee is authorized by law to accept;(f) Payment of enrollment and course fees and reasonable travel expenses attributable to attending seminars and educational programs sponsored by a bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional, educational, trade, or charitable association or institution. As used in this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging, and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the day after the event;(g) Items returned by the recipient to the donor within 30 days of receipt or donated to a charitable organization within 30 days of receipt;(h) Campaign contributions reported under Title 29B RCW;(i) Discounts available to an individual as a member of an employee group, occupation, or similar broad-based group; and(j) Awards, prizes, scholarships, or other items provided in recognition of academic or scientific achievement.(10)))(15) "Federal holiday" means the legal public holidays provided in 5 U.S.C. Sec. 6103(a), as it existed on the effective date of this section.(16) "Head of agency" means the chief executive officer of an agency. In the case of an agency headed by a commission, board, committee, or other body consisting of more than one natural person, agency head means the person or board authorized to appoint agency employees and regulate their conduct.(((11)))(17) "Honorarium" means money or thing of value offered to a state officer or state employee for a speech, appearance, article, or similar item or activity in connection with the state officer's or state employee's official role.(((12)))(18) "Institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.10.016.(((13)))(19) "Lobbying the legislature" means attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington.(20) "Official duty" means those duties within the specific scope of employment of the state officer or state employee as defined by the officer's or employee's agency or by statute or the state Constitution.(((14)))(21) "Official position" means holding an office or having authority.(22) "Participate" means to participate in state action or a proceeding personally and substantially as a state officer or state employee, through approval, disapproval, decision, recommendation, the rendering of advice, investigation, or otherwise but does not include preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation or the performance of legislative duties.(((15)))(23) "Person" means any individual, partnership, association, corporation, firm, institution, or other entity, whether or not operated for profit.(((16)))(24) "Regulatory agency" means any state board, commission, department, or officer, except those in the legislative or judicial branches, authorized by law to conduct adjudicative proceedings, issue permits or licenses, or to control or affect interests of identified persons.(((17)))(25) "Responsibility" in connection with a transaction involving the state, means the direct administrative or operating authority, whether intermediate or final, and either exercisable alone or through subordinates, effectively to approve, disapprove, or otherwise direct state action in respect of such transaction.(((18)))(26) "State action" means any action on the part of an agency, including, but not limited to:(a) A decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order; and(b) A grant, payment, award, license, contract, transaction, sanction, or approval, or the denial thereof, or failure to act with respect to a decision, determination, finding, ruling, or order.(((19)))(27) "State employee" means an individual who is employed by an agency in any branch of state government. For purposes of this chapter, employees of the superior courts are not state officers or state employees.(((20)))(28) "State officer" means every person holding a position of public trust in or under an executive, legislative, or judicial office of the state. "State officer" includes judges of the superior court, judges of the court of appeals, justices of the supreme court, members of the legislature together with the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives, holders of elective offices in the executive branch of state government, chief executive officers of state agencies, members of boards, commissions, or committees with authority over one or more state agencies or institutions, and employees of the state who are engaged in supervisory, policy-making, or policy-enforcing work. For the purposes of this chapter, "state officer" also includes any person exercising or undertaking to exercise the powers or functions of a state officer.(((21)))(29) "Thing of economic value," in addition to its ordinary meaning, includes:(a) A loan, property interest, interest in a contract or other chose in action, and employment or another arrangement involving a right to compensation;(b) An option, irrespective of the conditions to the exercise of the option; and(c) A promise or undertaking for the present or future delivery or procurement.(((22)))(30)(a) "Transaction involving the state" means a proceeding, application, submission, request for a ruling or other determination, contract, claim, case, or other similar matter that the state officer, state employee, or former state officer or state employee in question believes, or has reason to believe:(i) Is, or will be, the subject of state action; or(ii) Is one to which the state is or will be a party; or(iii) Is one in which the state has a direct and substantial proprietary interest.(b) "Transaction involving the state" does not include the following: Preparation, consideration, or enactment of legislation, including appropriation of moneys in a budget, or the performance of legislative duties by an officer or employee; or a claim, case, lawsuit, or similar matter if the officer or employee did not participate in the underlying transaction involving the state that is the basis for the claim, case, or lawsuit.(((23)))(31) "University" includes "state universities" and "regional universities" as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and also includes any research or technology institute affiliated with a university.(((24)))(32) "University research employee" means a state officer or state employee employed by a university, but only to the extent the state officer or state employee is engaged in research, technology transfer, approved consulting activities related to research and technology transfer, or other incidental activities.Sec. 3. RCW 42.52.030 and 2005 c 106 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No state officer or state employee, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, may ((be beneficially interested, directly or indirectly,))have a beneficial interest in a contract, sale, lease, purchase, or grant that may be made by, through, or is under the supervision of the officer or employee, in whole or in part, or accept((, directly or indirectly,)) any compensation, gratuity, or reward from any other person ((beneficially interested))who has a beneficial interest in the contract, sale, lease, purchase, or grant.(2) No state officer or state employee may participate in a transaction involving the state in his or her official capacity with a person of which the officer or employee is an officer, agent, employee, or member, or in which the officer or employee owns a beneficial interest, except that an officer or employee of an institution of higher education ((or the Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute)) may serve as an officer, agent, employee, or member, or on the board of directors, board of trustees, advisory board, or committee or review panel for any nonprofit institute, foundation, or fund-raising entity; and may serve as a member of an advisory board, committee, or review panel for a governmental or other nonprofit entity.Sec. 4. RCW 42.52.070 and 2022 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as required to perform duties within the scope of employment, no state officer or state employee may use his or her position to secure special privileges or exemptions for himself or herself, or his or her spouse, child, parents, or other persons.(2) For purposes of this section, and only as applied to legislators and employees under the jurisdiction of the legislative ethics board, activities within the scope of employment include but are not limited to duties enumerated in law and activities that have a tangible legislative nexus as described in section 12 of this act. ((Activities with a legislative nexus include but are not limited to:(a) Communications directly pertaining to any legislative proposal which has been introduced in either chamber of the legislature; and(b) Posting information to a legislator's official legislative website, including an official legislative social media account, about:(i) Emergencies;(ii) Federal holidays, state and legislatively recognized holidays established under RCW 1.16.050, and religious holidays;(iii) Information originally provided or published by other government entities which provide information about government resources; and(iv) Achievements, honors, or awards of extraordinary distinction.(3) It is not a violation of this section for a legislator or an appropriate legislative staff designee to engage in activities listed in subsection (2) of this section.(4)))(3) For purposes of this section, and only as applied to legislators and employees of the legislative branch, "special privileges" includes, but is not limited to, engaging in behavior that constitutes harassment. As used in this section:(a) "Harassment" means engaging in physical, verbal, visual, or psychological conduct that:(i) Has the purpose or effect of interfering with the person's work performance;(ii) Creates a hostile, intimidating, or offensive work environment; or(iii) Constitutes sexual harassment.(b) "Sexual harassment" means unwelcome or unwanted sexual advances, requests for sexual or romantic favors, sexually motivated bullying, or other verbal, visual, physical, or psychological conduct or communication of a sexual or romantic nature, when:(i) Submission to the conduct or communication is either explicitly or implicitly a term or condition of current or future employment;(ii) Submission to or rejection of the conduct or communication is used as the basis of an employment decision affecting the person; or(iii) The conduct or communication unreasonably interferes with the person's job performance or creates a work environment that is hostile, intimidating, or offensive.Sec. 5. RCW 42.52.080 and 1999 c 299 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No former state officer or state employee may, within a period of one year from the date of termination of state employment, accept employment or receive compensation from an employer if:(a) The officer or employee, during the two years immediately preceding termination of state employment, was engaged in the negotiation or administration on behalf of the state or agency of one or more contracts with that employer and was in a position to make discretionary decisions affecting the outcome of such negotiation or the nature of such administration;(b) Such a contract or contracts have a total value of more than ten thousand dollars; and(c) The duties of the employment with the employer or the activities for which the compensation would be received include fulfilling or implementing, in whole or in part, the provisions of such a contract or contracts or include the supervision or control of actions taken to fulfill or implement, in whole or in part, the provisions of such a contract or contracts. This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit a state officer or state employee from accepting employment with a state employee organization.(2) No person who has served as a state officer or state employee may, within a period of two years following the termination of state employment, have a ((direct or indirect)) beneficial interest in a contract or grant that was expressly authorized or funded by specific legislative or executive action in which the former state officer or state employee participated.(3) No former state officer or state employee may accept an offer of employment or receive compensation from an employer if the officer or employee knows or has reason to believe that the offer of employment or compensation was intended, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, to influence the officer or employee or as compensation or reward for the performance or nonperformance of a duty by the officer or employee during the course of state employment.(4) No former state officer or state employee may accept an offer of employment or receive compensation from an employer if the circumstances would lead a reasonable person to believe the offer has been made, or compensation given, for the purpose of influencing the performance or nonperformance of duties by the officer or employee during the course of state employment.(5) No former state officer or state employee may at any time subsequent to his or her state employment assist another person, whether or not for compensation, in any transaction involving the state in which the former state officer or state employee at any time participated during state employment. This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit any employee or officer of a state employee organization from rendering assistance to state officers or state employees in the course of employee organization business.(6) As used in this section, "employer" means a person as defined in RCW 42.52.010 or any other entity or business that the person owns or in which the person has a controlling interest. For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, the term "employer" does not include a successor organization to the rural development council under chapter 43.31 RCW.Sec. 6. RCW 42.52.090 and 1994 c 154 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:This chapter shall not be construed to prevent a former state officer or state employee from rendering assistance to others if the assistance is provided without compensation in any form and is limited to one or more of the following:(1) Providing the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of state agencies or state employees;(2) Providing free transportation to another for the purpose of conducting business with a state agency;(3) Assisting ((a natural person))an individual or nonprofit corporation in obtaining or completing application forms or other forms required by a state agency for the conduct of a state business; or(4) Providing assistance to the poor and infirm.Sec. 7. RCW 42.52.110 and 1996 c 213 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:No state officer or state employee may, directly or indirectly, ask for or give or receive or agree to receive any compensation, gift, reward, or gratuity from a source for performing or omitting or deferring the performance of any official duty, unless otherwise authorized by law except: (1) The state of Washington; or (2) in the case of officers or employees of institutions of higher education ((or of the Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute)), a governmental entity, an agency or instrumentality of a governmental entity, or a nonprofit corporation organized for the benefit and support of the state employee's agency or other state agencies pursuant to an agreement with the state employee's agency.Sec. 8. RCW 42.52.120 and 1997 c 318 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No state officer or state employee may receive any thing of economic value under any contract or grant outside of his or her official duties. The prohibition in this subsection does not apply where the state officer or state employee has ((complied with RCW 42.52.030(2) or))met each of the following conditions ((are met)):(a) The contract or grant is bona fide and actually performed;(b) The performance or administration of the contract or grant is not within the course of the officer's or employee's official duties, or is not under the officer's or employee's official supervision;(c) The performance of the contract or grant is not prohibited by RCW 42.52.040 or by applicable laws or rules governing outside employment for the officer or employee;(d) The contract or grant is neither performed for nor compensated by any person from whom such officer or employee would be prohibited by RCW 42.52.150(((4)))(6) from receiving a gift;(e) The contract or grant is not one expressly created or authorized by the officer or employee in his or her official capacity;(f) The contract or grant would not require unauthorized disclosure of confidential information.(2) In addition to satisfying the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, a state officer or state employee may have a beneficial interest in a grant or contract or a series of substantially identical contracts or grants with a state agency only if:(a) The contract or grant is awarded or issued as a result of an open and competitive bidding process in which more than one bid or grant application was received; or(b) The contract or grant is awarded or issued as a result of an open and competitive bidding or selection process in which the officer's or employee's bid or proposal was the only bid or proposal received and the officer or employee has been advised by the appropriate ethics board, before execution of the contract or grant, that the contract or grant would not be in conflict with the proper discharge of the officer's or employee's official duties; or(c) The process for awarding the contract or issuing the grant is not open and competitive, but the officer or employee has been advised by the appropriate ethics board after the contract or grant has been awarded that the contract or grant would not be in conflict with the proper discharge of the officer's or employee's official duties.(3) A state officer or state employee awarded a contract or issued a grant in compliance with subsection (2) of this section shall file the contract or grant with the appropriate ethics board within thirty days after the date of execution; however, if proprietary formulae, designs, drawings, or research are included in the contract or grant, the proprietary formulae, designs, drawings, or research may be deleted from the contract or grant filed with the appropriate ethics board.(4) This section does not prevent a state officer or state employee from receiving compensation contributed from the treasury of the United States, another state, county, or municipality if the compensation is received pursuant to arrangements entered into between such state, county, municipality, or the United States and the officer's or employee's agency. This section does not prohibit a state officer or state employee from serving or performing any duties under an employment contract with a governmental entity.(5) As used in this section, "officer" and "employee" do not include officers and employees who, in accordance with the terms of their employment or appointment, are serving without compensation from the state of Washington or are receiving from the state only reimbursement of expenses incurred or a predetermined allowance for such expenses.Sec. 9. RCW 42.52.150 and 2023 c 91 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Unless the context requires otherwise, the definition of "gift" in this subsection applies throughout this chapter.(b) "Gift" means anything of economic value for which no consideration is given.(c) "Gift" does not include the following:(i) Items from family members or friends where it is clear beyond a reasonable doubt that the gift was not made as part of any design to gain or maintain influence in the agency of which the recipient is an officer or employee;(ii) Items related to the outside business of the recipient that are customary and not related to the recipient's performance of official duties;(iii) Items exchanged among officials and employees at a social event hosted or sponsored by a state officer or state employee for coworkers;(iv) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation, appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity. As used in this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging, and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the day after the event;(v) Items a state officer or state employee is authorized by law to accept;(vi) Payment of enrollment and course fees and reasonable travel expenses attributable to attending seminars and educational programs sponsored by a bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional, educational, trade, or charitable association or institution. As used in this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging, and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the day after the event;(vii) Items returned by the recipient to the donor within 30 days of receipt or donated to a charitable organization within 30 days of receipt;(viii) Campaign contributions reported under chapter 42.17A RCW;(ix) Discounts available to an individual as a member of an employee group, occupation, or similar broad-based group;(x) Awards, prizes, scholarships, or other items provided in recognition of academic or scientific achievement; and(xi) Gift cards received by legislative employees in an amount of $25 or less.(2) No state officer or state employee may receive, accept, take, seek, or solicit, directly or indirectly, any thing of economic value as a gift, gratuity, or favor from a person if it could be reasonably expected that the gift, gratuity, or favor would influence the vote, action, or judgment of the officer or employee, or be considered as part of a reward for action or inaction.(3) No state officer or state employee may accept gifts, other than those specified in subsections (((2) and (5)))(4) and (7) of this section, with an aggregate value in excess of ((fifty dollars))$100 from a single source in a calendar year or a single gift from multiple sources with a value in excess of ((fifty dollars))$100. For purposes of this section, "single source" means any person, as defined in RCW 42.52.010, whether acting directly or through any agent or other intermediary, and "single gift" includes any event, item, or group of items used in conjunction with each other or any trip including transportation, lodging, and attendant costs, not excluded from the definition of gift under ((RCW 42.52.010))subsection (1)(c) of this section. The value of gifts given to an officer's or employee's family member or guest shall be attributed to the official or employee for the purpose of determining whether the limit has been exceeded, unless an independent business, family, or social relationship exists between the donor and the family member or guest.(((2)))(4) Except as provided in subsection (((4)))(6) of this section, the following items are presumed not to influence under ((RCW 42.52.140))subsection (3) of this section, and may be accepted without regard to the limit established by subsection (((1)))(3) of this section:(a) Unsolicited flowers, plants, and floral arrangements;(b) Unsolicited advertising or promotional items of nominal value, such as pens and note pads;(c) Unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation in the form of a plaque, trophy, desk item, wall memento, or similar item;(d) Unsolicited items received by a state officer or state employee for the purpose of evaluation or review, if the officer or employee has no personal beneficial interest in the eventual use or acquisition of the item by the officer's or employee's agency;(e) Informational material, publications, or subscriptions related to the recipient's performance of official duties;(f) Food and beverages consumed at hosted receptions where attendance is related to the state officer's or state employee's official duties;(g) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise accepted and solicited for deposit in the legislative international trade account created in RCW 43.15.050;(h) ((Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise accepted and solicited for the purpose of promoting the expansion of tourism as provided for in RCW 43.330.090;(i))) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal property, or both, solicited on behalf of a national or regional legislative association as defined in RCW 42.52.822(2), the 2006 official conference of the national lieutenant governors' association, the annual conference of the national association of state treasurers, or a host committee, for the purpose of hosting an official conference under the circumstances specified in RCW 42.52.820, section 2, chapter 5, Laws of 2006, RCW 42.52.821, or RCW 42.52.822. Anything solicited or accepted may only be received by the national association or host committee and may not be commingled with any funds or accounts that are the property of any person;(((j)))(i) Admission to, and the cost of food and beverages consumed at, events sponsored by or in conjunction with a civic, charitable, governmental, or community organization;(((k)))(j) Unsolicited gifts from dignitaries from another state or a foreign country that are intended to be personal in nature; ((and(l)))(k) Gifts, grants, donations, sponsorships, or contributions from any agency or federal or local government agency or program or private source for the purposes of chapter 28B.156 RCW; and(l) Unsolicited gifts received by legislative employees from a legislator.(((3)))(5) The presumption in subsection (((2)))(4) of this section is rebuttable and may be overcome based on the circumstances surrounding the giving and acceptance of the item.(((4)))(6) Notwithstanding subsections (((2) and (5)))(4) and (7) of this section, a state officer or state employee of a regulatory agency or of an agency that seeks to acquire goods or services who participates in those regulatory or contractual matters may receive, accept, take, or seek, directly or indirectly, only the following items from a person regulated by the agency or from a person who seeks to provide goods or services to the agency:(a) Unsolicited advertising or promotional items of nominal value, such as pens and note pads;(b) Unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation in the form of a plaque, trophy, desk item, wall memento, or similar item;(c) Unsolicited items received by a state officer or state employee for the purpose of evaluation or review, if the officer or employee has no personal ((beneficial)) interest in the eventual use or acquisition of the item by the officer's or employee's agency;(d) Informational material, publications, or subscriptions related to the recipient's performance of official duties;(e) Food and beverages consumed at hosted receptions where attendance is related to the state officer's or state employee's official duties;(f) Admission to, and the cost of food and beverages consumed at, events sponsored by or in conjunction with a civic, charitable, governmental, or community organization; and(g) Those items excluded from the definition of gift in ((RCW 42.52.010))subsection (1)(c) of this section except:(i) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation, appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity;(ii) Payments for seminars and educational programs sponsored by a bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional, educational, trade, or charitable association or institution; and(iii) Flowers, plants, and floral arrangements.(((5)))(7) A state officer or state employee may accept gifts in the form of food and beverage on infrequent occasions in the ordinary course of meals where attendance by the officer or employee is related to the performance of official duties. Gifts in the form of food and beverage that exceed ((fifty dollars))$100 on a single occasion shall be reported as provided in chapter 42.17A RCW.Sec. 10. RCW 42.52.150 and 2024 c 164 s 514 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Unless the context requires otherwise, the definition of "gift" in this subsection applies throughout this chapter.(b) "Gift" means anything of economic value for which no consideration is given.(c) "Gift" does not include the following:(i) Items from family members or friends where it is clear beyond a reasonable doubt that the gift was not made as part of any design to gain or maintain influence in the agency of which the recipient is an officer or employee;(ii) Items related to the outside business of the recipient that are customary and not related to the recipient's performance of official duties;(iii) Items exchanged among officials and employees at a social event hosted or sponsored by a state officer or state employee for coworkers;(iv) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation, appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity. As used in this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging, and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the day after the event;(v) Items a state officer or state employee is authorized by law to accept;(vi) Payment of enrollment and course fees and reasonable travel expenses attributable to attending seminars and educational programs sponsored by a bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional, educational, trade, or charitable association or institution. As used in this subsection, "reasonable expenses" are limited to travel, lodging, and subsistence expenses incurred the day before through the day after the event;(vii) Items returned by the recipient to the donor within 30 days of receipt or donated to a charitable organization within 30 days of receipt;(viii) Campaign contributions reported under Title 29B RCW;(ix) Discounts available to an individual as a member of an employee group, occupation, or similar broad-based group;(x) Awards, prizes, scholarships, or other items provided in recognition of academic or scientific achievement; and(xi) Gift cards received by legislative employees in an amount of $25 or less.(2) No state officer or state employee may receive, accept, take, seek, or solicit, directly or indirectly, any thing of economic value as a gift, gratuity, or favor from a person if it could be reasonably expected that the gift, gratuity, or favor would influence the vote, action, or judgment of the officer or employee, or be considered as part of a reward for action or inaction.(3) No state officer or state employee may accept gifts, other than those specified in subsections (((2) and (5)))(4) and (7) of this section, with an aggregate value in excess of ((fifty dollars))$100 from a single source in a calendar year or a single gift from multiple sources with a value in excess of ((fifty dollars))$100. For purposes of this section, "single source" means any person, as defined in RCW 42.52.010, whether acting directly or through any agent or other intermediary, and "single gift" includes any event, item, or group of items used in conjunction with each other or any trip including transportation, lodging, and attendant costs, not excluded from the definition of gift under ((RCW 42.52.010))subsection (1)(c) of this section. The value of gifts given to an officer's or employee's family member or guest shall be attributed to the official or employee for the purpose of determining whether the limit has been exceeded, unless an independent business, family, or social relationship exists between the donor and the family member or guest.(((2)))(4) Except as provided in subsection (((4)))(6) of this section, the following items are presumed not to influence under ((RCW 42.52.140))subsection (3) of this section, and may be accepted without regard to the limit established by subsection (((1)))(3) of this section:(a) Unsolicited flowers, plants, and floral arrangements;(b) Unsolicited advertising or promotional items of nominal value, such as pens and note pads;(c) Unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation in the form of a plaque, trophy, desk item, wall memento, or similar item;(d) Unsolicited items received by a state officer or state employee for the purpose of evaluation or review, if the officer or employee has no personal beneficial interest in the eventual use or acquisition of the item by the officer's or employee's agency;(e) Informational material, publications, or subscriptions related to the recipient's performance of official duties;(f) Food and beverages consumed at hosted receptions where attendance is related to the state officer's or state employee's official duties;(g) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise accepted and solicited for deposit in the legislative international trade account created in RCW 43.15.050;(h) ((Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise accepted and solicited for the purpose of promoting the expansion of tourism as provided for in RCW 43.330.090;(i))) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal property, or both, solicited on behalf of a national or regional legislative association as defined in RCW 42.52.822(2), the 2006 official conference of the national lieutenant governors' association, the annual conference of the national association of state treasurers, or a host committee, for the purpose of hosting an official conference under the circumstances specified in RCW 42.52.820, section 2, chapter 5, Laws of 2006, RCW 42.52.821, or RCW 42.52.822. Anything solicited or accepted may only be received by the national association or host committee and may not be commingled with any funds or accounts that are the property of any person;(((j)))(i) Admission to, and the cost of food and beverages consumed at, events sponsored by or in conjunction with a civic, charitable, governmental, or community organization;(((k)))(j) Unsolicited gifts from dignitaries from another state or a foreign country that are intended to be personal in nature; ((and(l)))(k) Gifts, grants, donations, sponsorships, or contributions from any agency or federal or local government agency or program or private source for the purposes of chapter 28B.156 RCW; and(l) Unsolicited gifts received by legislative employees from a legislator.(((3)))(5) The presumption in subsection (((2)))(4) of this section is rebuttable and may be overcome based on the circumstances surrounding the giving and acceptance of the item.(((4)))(6) Notwithstanding subsections (((2) and (5)))(4) and (7) of this section, a state officer or state employee of a regulatory agency or of an agency that seeks to acquire goods or services who participates in those regulatory or contractual matters may receive, accept, take, or seek, directly or indirectly, only the following items from a person regulated by the agency or from a person who seeks to provide goods or services to the agency:(a) Unsolicited advertising or promotional items of nominal value, such as pens and note pads;(b) Unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation in the form of a plaque, trophy, desk item, wall memento, or similar item;(c) Unsolicited items received by a state officer or state employee for the purpose of evaluation or review, if the officer or employee has no personal ((beneficial)) interest in the eventual use or acquisition of the item by the officer's or employee's agency;(d) Informational material, publications, or subscriptions related to the recipient's performance of official duties;(e) Food and beverages consumed at hosted receptions where attendance is related to the state officer's or state employee's official duties;(f) Admission to, and the cost of food and beverages consumed at, events sponsored by or in conjunction with a civic, charitable, governmental, or community organization; and(g) Those items excluded from the definition of gift in ((RCW 42.52.010))subsection (1)(c) of this section except:(i) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation, appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity;(ii) Payments for seminars and educational programs sponsored by a bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional, educational, trade, or charitable association or institution; and(iii) Flowers, plants, and floral arrangements.(((5)))(7) A state officer or state employee may accept gifts in the form of food and beverage on infrequent occasions in the ordinary course of meals where attendance by the officer or employee is related to the performance of official duties. Gifts in the form of food and beverage that exceed ((fifty dollars))$100 on a single occasion shall be reported as provided in Title 29B RCW.Sec. 11. RCW 42.52.160 and 2024 c 333 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No state officer or state employee may employ or use any person, money, or property under the officer's or employee's official control or direction, or in his or her official custody, for the private benefit or gain of the officer, employee, or another.(2) This section does not prohibit the use of public resources to benefit others as part of a state officer's or state employee's official duties. It is not a violation of this section for a legislator or ((an appropriate legislative staff designee))employees under the jurisdiction of the legislative ethics board to engage in activities listed under RCW ((42.52.070(2) or)) 42.52.822 or section 12 of this act.(3) This section does not prohibit de minimis use of state facilities to provide employees with information about (a) medical, surgical, and hospital care; (b) life insurance or accident and health disability insurance; or (c) individual retirement accounts, by any person, firm, or corporation administering such program as part of authorized payroll deductions pursuant to RCW 41.04.020.(4) The appropriate ethics boards may adopt rules providing exceptions to this section for occasional use of the state officer or state employee, of de minimis cost and value, if the activity does not result in interference with the proper performance of ((public))official duties.(5) This section does not apply to activities conducted by legislative employees authorized under RCW 44.90.110.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW to read as follows:(1) This section applies to legislators and employees under the jurisdiction of the legislative ethics board.(2) Legislative nexus means activities by legislators and staff having a reasonably objective connection to the legislator's or staff's official duties or to the policy or programmatic prerogatives of the legislature, or the legislative institution. In cases where legislative nexus is required for the use of state resources, activities with a per se tangible legislative nexus also include the following:(a) Communications directly pertaining to any legislative proposal which has been introduced in either chamber of the legislature; and(b) Posting information to an official legislative website or social media account about:(i) Emergencies;(ii) Federal holidays, state holidays recognized under RCW 1.16.050, religious holidays, and generally recognized days or months of note;(iii) Information originally provided or published by other government entities which provide information about government resources;(iv) Achievements, honors, or awards of extraordinary distinction received by a constituent who has granted permission to post about the achievement, honor, or award;(v) A legislator if the information posted has a direct and tangible relationship to a legislative proposal or policy introduced in the legislature; and(vi) Commemorations or celebrations of Washington state historical events, holidays, or persons who are not current legislators.Sec. 13. RCW 42.52.180 and 2022 c 37 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use of facilities of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign for election of a person to an office or for the promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition. Knowing acquiescence by a person with authority to direct, control, or influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state employees of the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space, publications of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the agency.(2) ((This))Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to the following activities:(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot proposition as long as (i) required notice of the meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition, and (ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an opposing view;(b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes of this subsection, it is not a violation of this section for an elected official to respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to make incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an actual, measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards shall adopt by rule a definition of measurable expenditure;(c)(i) The maintenance of official legislative websites throughout the year, regardless of pending elections. The websites may contain any discretionary material which was also specifically prepared for the legislator in the course of his or her official duties as a legislator, including newsletters and press releases.(ii) The official legislative websites of legislators seeking reelection or election to any office shall not be altered, other than during a special legislative session or to change office contact information, beginning on the first day of the declaration of candidacy filing period specified in RCW 29A.24.050 through the date of certification by the secretary of state of the general election of the election year. As used in this subsection, "legislator" means a legislator who is a "candidate," as defined in RCW 42.17A.005, for any public office. "Legislator" does not include a member of the legislature who has announced their retirement from elected public office and who does not file a declaration of candidacy by the end of the candidacy filing period specified in RCW 29A.24.050.(iii) The website shall not be used for campaign purposes;(d) Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or agency((, which include but are not limited to:(i) Communications by a legislator or appropriate legislative staff designee directly pertaining to any legislative proposal which has been introduced in either chamber of the legislature; and(ii) Posting, by a legislator or appropriate legislative staff designee, information to a legislator's official legislative website including an official legislative social media account, about:(A) Emergencies;(B) Federal holidays, state and legislatively recognized holidays established under RCW 1.16.050, and religious holidays;(C) Information originally provided or published by other government entities which provide information about government resources; and(D) Achievements, honors, or awards of extraordinary distinction; and));(e) De minimis use of public facilities by statewide elected officials and legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of permissible communications, including written and verbal communications initiated by them of their views on ballot propositions that foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their constitutional or statutory responsibilities; and(f) Activities with a legislative nexus as described under section 12 of this act. For the official legislative website of a legislator, this subsection is subject to subsection (2)(c)(ii) of this section. Official legislative websites that are not the official legislative website of a legislator are not subject to subsection (2)(c)(ii) of this section but may not directly or indirectly reference a ballot measure or legislator running for elected office, during the period described in subsection (2)(c)(ii) of this section.(3) As to state officers and employees, this section operates to the exclusion of RCW 42.17A.555.(4) As used in this section, "official legislative website" includes, but is not limited to, a legislator's official legislative social media accounts.Sec. 14. RCW 42.52.180 and 2024 c 164 s 515 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use of facilities of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign for election of a person to an office or for the promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition. Knowing acquiescence by a person with authority to direct, control, or influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state employees of the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space, publications of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the agency.(2) ((This))Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to the following activities:(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot proposition as long as (i) required notice of the meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition, and (ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an opposing view;(b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes of this subsection, it is not a violation of this section for an elected official to respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to make incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an actual, measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards shall adopt by rule a definition of measurable expenditure;(c)(i) The maintenance of official legislative websites throughout the year, regardless of pending elections. The websites may contain any discretionary material which was also specifically prepared for the legislator in the course of his or her official duties as a legislator, including newsletters and press releases.(ii) The official legislative websites of legislators seeking reelection or election to any office shall not be altered, other than during a special legislative session or to change office contact information, beginning on the first day of the declaration of candidacy filing period specified in RCW 29A.24.050 through the date of certification by the secretary of state of the general election of the election year. As used in this subsection, "legislator" means a legislator who is a "candidate," as defined in RCW 29B.10.090, for any public office. "Legislator" does not include a member of the legislature who has announced their retirement from elected public office and who does not file a declaration of candidacy by the end of the candidacy filing period specified in RCW 29A.24.050.(iii) The website shall not be used for campaign purposes;(d) Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or agency((, which include but are not limited to:(i) Communications by a legislator or appropriate legislative staff designee directly pertaining to any legislative proposal which has been introduced in either chamber of the legislature; and(ii) Posting, by a legislator or appropriate legislative staff designee, information to a legislator's official legislative website including an official legislative social media account, about:(A) Emergencies;(B) Federal holidays, state and legislatively recognized holidays established under RCW 1.16.050, and religious holidays;(C) Information originally provided or published by other government entities which provide information about government resources; and(D) Achievements, honors, or awards of extraordinary distinction; and));(e) De minimis use of public facilities by statewide elected officials and legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of permissible communications, including written and verbal communications initiated by them of their views on ballot propositions that foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their constitutional or statutory responsibilities; and(f) Activities with a legislative nexus as described under section 12 of this act. For the official legislative website of a legislator, this subsection is subject to subsection (2)(c)(ii) of this section. Official legislative websites that are not the official legislative website of a legislator are not subject to subsection (2)(c)(ii) of this section but may not directly or indirectly reference a ballot measure or legislator running for elected office, during the period described in subsection (2)(c)(ii) of this section.(3) As to state officers and employees, this section operates to the exclusion of RCW 29B.45.010.(4) As used in this section, "official legislative website" includes, but is not limited to, a legislator's official legislative social media accounts.Sec. 15. RCW 42.52.220 and 2022 c 173 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Consistent with the state policy to encourage basic and applied scientific research by the state's research universities as stated in RCW 28B.140.005, and consistent with the expectations of university faculty to produce, publish, and disseminate research and scholarship, each university and the state board for community and technical colleges may develop, adopt, and implement one or more written administrative processes that shall apply in place of the obligations imposed on institutions of higher education, faculty, and university research employees under RCW 42.52.030, 42.52.040, 42.52.080, 42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.130, ((42.52.140,)) 42.52.150, and 42.52.160. The institutions of higher education shall coordinate on the development of administrative processes to ensure the processes are comparable. Each policy shall apply upon approval by boards of trustees or regents for the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College, or by the state board for community and technical colleges. Each board of trustees or regents and the state board for community and technical colleges must provide the executive ethics board with a copy of each institution's policy upon approval. A faculty member or university research employee in compliance with the processes authorized in this section shall be deemed to be in compliance with RCW 42.52.030, 42.52.040, 42.52.080, 42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.130, ((42.52.140,)) 42.52.150, and 42.52.160.(2) The executive ethics board shall enforce activity subject to the written approval processes under this section, as provided in RCW 42.52.360.Sec. 16. RCW 42.52.320 and 1994 c 154 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The legislative ethics board shall enforce this chapter and rules adopted under it with respect to members and employees of the legislature.(2) The legislative ethics board shall:(a) Develop educational materials and training with regard to legislative ethics for legislators and legislative employees;(b) Issue advisory opinions;(c) Adopt rules or policies governing the conduct of business by the board, and adopt rules defining working hours for purposes of RCW 42.52.180 and where otherwise authorized under chapter 154, Laws of 1994;(d) Investigate, hear, and determine complaints by any person or on its own motion;(e) Impose sanctions including reprimands and monetary penalties;(f) Recommend suspension or removal to the appropriate legislative entity, or recommend prosecution to the appropriate authority; and(g) Establish criteria regarding the levels of civil penalties appropriate for different types of violations of this chapter and rules adopted under it.(3) The board may:(a) Issue subpoenas for the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence relating to any matter under examination by the board or involved in any hearing;(b) Administer oaths and affirmations;(c) Examine witnesses; and(d) Receive evidence.(((4) Subject to RCW 42.52.540, the board has jurisdiction over any alleged violation that occurred before January 1, 1995, and that was within the jurisdiction of any of the boards established under chapter 44.60 RCW. The board's jurisdiction with respect to any such alleged violation shall be based on the statutes and rules in effect at [the] time of the violation.))Sec. 17. RCW 42.52.480 and 1994 c 154 s 218 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, an ethics board may order payment of the following amounts if it finds a violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it after a hearing under RCW 42.52.370 or other applicable law:(a) Any damages sustained by the state that are caused by the conduct constituting the violation;(b) From each such person, a civil penalty of up to five thousand dollars per violation or three times the economic value of any thing received or sought in violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it, whichever is greater; and(c) Costs, including reasonable investigative ((costs, which shall be included as part of the limit under (b) of this subsection. The costs may not exceed the penalty imposed. The payment owed on the penalty shall be reduced by the amount of the costs paid))expenses.(2) Damages under this section may be enforced in the same manner as a judgment in a civil case.Sec. 18. RCW 42.52.490 and 1994 c 154 s 219 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon a written determination by the attorney general that the action of an ethics board was clearly erroneous or if requested by an ethics board, the attorney general may bring a civil action in the superior court of the county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred against a state officer, state employee, former state officer, former state employee, or other person who has violated or knowingly assisted another person in violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under it. In such action the attorney general may recover the following amounts on behalf of the state of Washington:(a) Any damages sustained by the state that are caused by the conduct constituting the violation;(b) From each such person, a civil penalty of up to five thousand dollars per violation or three times the economic value of any thing received or sought in violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under it, whichever is greater; and(c) Costs, including reasonable investigative ((costs, which shall be included as part of the limit under (b) of this subsection. The costs may not exceed the penalty imposed. The payment owed on the penalty shall be reduced by the amount of the costs paid))expenses.(2) In any civil action brought by the attorney general upon the basis that the attorney general has determined that the board's action was clearly erroneous, the court shall not proceed with the action unless the attorney general has first shown, and the court has found, that the action of the board was clearly erroneous.Sec. 19. RCW 42.52.805 and 2007 c 452 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) When soliciting gifts, grants, or donations solely to support the charitable activities of executive branch state employees conducted pursuant to RCW 9.46.0209, the executive branch state officers and executive branch state employees are presumed not to be in violation of the solicitation and receipt of gift provisions in RCW ((42.52.140))42.52.150(3). However, the gifts, grants, or donations must only be solicited from state employees or businesses and organizations that have no business dealings with the soliciting employee's agency. For the purposes of this subsection, "business dealings" includes being subject to regulation by the agency, having a contractual relationship with the agency, and purchasing goods or services from the agency.(2) For purposes of this section, activities are deemed to be charitable if the activities are devoted to the purposes authorized under RCW 9.46.0209 for charitable and nonprofit organizations listed in that section, or are in support of the activities of those charitable or nonprofit organizations.Sec. 20. RCW 42.52.810 and 2005 c 274 s 293 are each amended to read as follows:(1) When soliciting charitable gifts, grants, or donations solely for the legislative international trade account created in RCW ((44.04.270))43.15.050, the president of the senate is presumed not to be in violation of the solicitation and receipt of gift provisions in RCW ((42.52.140))42.52.150(3).(2) When soliciting charitable gifts, grants, or donations solely for the legislative international trade account created in RCW ((44.04.270))43.15.050, state officers and state employees are presumed not to be in violation of the solicitation and receipt of gift provisions in RCW ((42.52.140))42.52.150(3).(3) An annual report of the legislative international trade account activities, including a list of receipts and expenditures, shall be published by the president of the senate and submitted to the house of representatives and the senate and be a public record for the purposes of RCW 42.56.070.Sec. 21. RCW 42.17A.005 and 2022 c 71 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies. "State agency" includes every state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency" includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or other local public agency. "Agency" does not include a comprehensive cancer center participating in a collaborative arrangement as defined in RCW 28B.10.930 that is operated in conformance with RCW 28B.10.930.(3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf of the candidate or public official.(4) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW 29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency from and after the time when the proposition has been initially filed with the appropriate election officer of that constituency before its circulation for signatures.(5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.(6) "Bona fide political party" means:(a) An organization that has been recognized as a minor political party by the secretary of state;(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, that is the body authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority on behalf of the state party; or(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district committee for each party in each legislative district.(7) "Books of account" means:(a) In the case of a campaign or political committee, a ledger or similar listing of contributions, expenditures, and debts, such as a campaign or committee is required to file regularly with the commission, current as of the most recent business day; or(b) In the case of a commercial advertiser, details of political advertising or electioneering communications provided by the advertiser, including the names and addresses of persons from whom it accepted political advertising or electioneering communications, the exact nature and extent of the services rendered and the total cost and the manner of payment for the services.(8) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination or election when the individual first:(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space or facilities with intent to promote the individual's candidacy for office;(b) Announces publicly or files for office;(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to promote the individual's candidacy; or(d) Gives consent to another person to take on behalf of the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.(9) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in the state senate or state house of representatives.(10) "Commercial advertiser" means any person that sells the service of communicating messages or producing material for broadcast or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public whether through brochures, fliers, newspapers, magazines, television, radio, billboards, direct mail advertising, printing, paid internet or digital communications, or any other means of mass communications used for the purpose of appealing, directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support in any election campaign.(11) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17A.100.(12) "Committee" unless the context indicates otherwise, includes a political committee such as a candidate, ballot proposition, recall, political, or continuing political committee.(13) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning, includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services of any kind. For the purpose of compliance with RCW 42.17A.710, "compensation" does not include per diem allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged in the official business of the governmental entity.(14) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee that is an organization of continuing existence not limited to participation in any particular election campaign or election cycle.(15)(a) "Contribution" includes:(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds, or anything of value, including personal and professional services for less than full consideration;(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a political or incidental committee, the person or persons named on the candidate's or committee's registration form who direct expenditures on behalf of the candidate or committee, or their agents;(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution, or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic, digital, or other form of political advertising or electioneering communication prepared by a candidate, a political or incidental committee, or its authorized agent;(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at the event.(b) "Contribution" does not include:(i) Accrued interest on money deposited in a political or incidental committee's account;(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political or incidental committee that is returned to the contributor within ten business days of the date on which it is received by the candidate or political or incidental committee;(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly scheduled news medium that is of interest to the public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a political or incidental committee;(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the members of or contributors to a political party organization or political or incidental committee, or to the officers, management staff, or stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members of a labor organization or other membership organization;(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services," for the purposes of this subsection, means services or labor for which the individual is not compensated by any person;(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts toward any applicable contribution limit of the person providing the facility;(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering such services; or(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring compliance with state election or public disclosure laws; or(ix) The performance of ministerial functions by a person on behalf of two or more candidates or political or incidental committees either as volunteer services defined in (b)(vi) of this subsection or for payment by the candidate or political or incidental committee for whom the services are performed as long as:(A) The person performs solely ministerial functions;(B) A person who is paid by two or more candidates or political or incidental committees is identified by the candidates and political committees on whose behalf services are performed as part of their respective statements of organization under RCW 42.17A.205; and(C) The person does not disclose, except as required by law, any information regarding a candidate's or committee's plans, projects, activities, or needs, or regarding a candidate's or committee's contributions or expenditures that is not already publicly available from campaign reports filed with the commission, or otherwise engage in activity that constitutes a contribution under (a)(ii) of this subsection.A person who performs ministerial functions under this subsection (15)(b)(ix) is not considered an agent of the candidate or committee as long as the person has no authority to authorize expenditures or make decisions on behalf of the candidate or committee.(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.(16) "Depository" means a bank, mutual savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union doing business in this state.(17) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy in any such office.(18) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is submitted to the voters. An election in which the qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for purposes of this chapter.(19) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.(20) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day of January after the date of the last previous general election for the office that the candidate seeks and ending on December 31st after the next election for the office. In the case of a special election to fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on December 31st after the special election.(21)(a) "Electioneering communication" means any broadcast, cable, or satellite television, radio transmission, digital communication, United States postal service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical that:(i) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or judicial office either by specifically naming the candidate, or identifying the candidate without using the candidate's name;(ii) Is broadcast, transmitted electronically or by other means, mailed, erected, distributed, or otherwise published within sixty days before any election for that office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking election; and(iii) Either alone, or in combination with one or more communications identifying the candidate by the same sponsor during the sixty days before an election, has a fair market value or cost of one thousand dollars or more.(b) "Electioneering communication" does not include:(i) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by a candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising appearing at least twelve months preceding the candidate becoming a candidate;(ii) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor, so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been invited to participate in the debate or forum;(iii) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly scheduled news medium that is:(A) Of interest to the public;(B) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that news medium; and(C) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political or incidental committee;(iv) Slate cards and sample ballots;(v) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar works (A) written by a candidate when the candidate entered into a contract for such publications or media at least twelve months before becoming a candidate, or (B) written about a candidate;(vi) Public service announcements;(vii) An internal political communication primarily limited to the members of or contributors to a political party organization or political or incidental committee, or to the officers, management staff, or stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members of a labor organization or other membership organization;(viii) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized committee of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or(ix) Any other communication exempted by the commission through rule consistent with the intent of this chapter.(22) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. "Expenditure" also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter, agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made. "Expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete repayment by a candidate or political or incidental committee of the principal of a loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly reported.(23) "Final report" means the report described as a final report in RCW 42.17A.235(11)(a).(24) "Foreign national" means:(a) An individual who is not a citizen of the United States and is not lawfully admitted for permanent residence;(b) A government, or subdivision, of a foreign country;(c) A foreign political party; and(d) Any entity, such as a partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons, that is organized under the laws of or has its principal place of business in a foreign country.(25) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17A.405 means the election that results in the election of a person to a state or local office. It does not include a primary.(26) "Gift" has the definition in RCW ((42.52.010))42.52.150.(27) "Immediate family" includes the spouse or domestic partner, dependent children, and other dependent relatives, if living in the household. For the purposes of the definition of "intermediary" in this section, "immediate family" means an individual's spouse or domestic partner, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual and the spouse or the domestic partner of any such person and a child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse or domestic partner and the spouse or the domestic partner of any such person.(28) "Incidental committee" means any nonprofit organization not otherwise defined as a political committee but that may incidentally make a contribution or an expenditure in excess of the reporting thresholds in RCW 42.17A.235, directly or through a political committee. Any nonprofit organization is not an incidental committee if it is only remitting payments through the nonprofit organization in an aggregated form and the nonprofit organization is not required to report those payments in accordance with this chapter.(29) "Incumbent" means a person who is in present possession of an elected office.(30)(a) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each of the following elements:(i) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for office by a person who is not:(A) A candidate for that office;(B) An authorized committee of that candidate for that office; and(C) A person who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any other candidate or candidates for that office;(ii) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for office by a person with whom the candidate has not collaborated for the purpose of making the expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any other candidate or candidates for that office;(iii) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate without using the candidate's name; and(iv) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or opposition to that candidate, has a value of one thousand dollars or more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under one thousand dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative value is one thousand dollars or more.(b) "Independent expenditure" does not include: Ordinary home hospitality; communications with journalists or editorial staff designed to elicit a news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general public, controlled by a person whose business is that news medium, and not controlled by a candidate or a political committee; participation in the creation of a publicly funded voters' pamphlet statement in written or video form; an internal political communication primarily limited to contributors to a political party organization or political action committee, the officers, management staff, and stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or the members of a labor organization or other membership organization; or the rendering of personal services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer campaign workers or incidental expenses personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of two hundred fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker.(31)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless the contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family, or an association to which the individual belongs.(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and customary rate.(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.(32) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments, nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of the state legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the subject of action by either house or any committee of the legislature and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both houses, are pending approval by the governor.(33) "Legislative office" means the office of a member of the state house of representatives or the office of a member of the state senate.(34) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency under the state administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of communicating with the members of that association or organization.(35) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either on the person's own or another's behalf.(36) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom a lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom the lobbyist is compensated for acting as a lobbyist.(37) "Ministerial functions" means an act or duty carried out as part of the duties of an administrative office without exercise of personal judgment or discretion.(38) "Participate" means that, with respect to a particular election, an entity:(a) Makes either a monetary or in-kind contribution to a candidate;(b) Makes an independent expenditure or electioneering communication in support of or opposition to a candidate;(c) Endorses a candidate before contributions are made by a subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that candidate's opponent;(d) Makes a recommendation regarding whether a candidate should be supported or opposed before a contribution is made by a subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that candidate's opponent; or(e) Directly or indirectly collaborates or consults with a subsidiary corporation or local unit on matters relating to the support of or opposition to a candidate, including, but not limited to, the amount of a contribution, when a contribution should be given, and what assistance, services or independent expenditures, or electioneering communications, if any, will be made or should be made in support of or opposition to a candidate.(39) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint venture, public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or local governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate, committee, political committee, political party, executive committee thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however organized.(40) "Political advertising" includes any advertising displays, newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles, tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, digital communication, or other means of mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing, directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support or opposition in any election campaign.(41) "Political committee" means any person (except a candidate or an individual dealing with the candidate's or individual's own funds or property) having the expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any ballot proposition.(42) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17A.405 means the procedure for nominating a candidate to state or local office under chapter 29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in large measure, the procedures established in chapter 29A.52 RCW.(43) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial, county, city, town, school district, port district, special district, or other state political subdivision elective office.(44) "Public record" has the definition in RCW 42.56.010.(45) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29A.56.120 and ending thirty days after the recall election.(46) "Remediable violation" means any violation of this chapter that:(a) Involved expenditures or contributions totaling no more than the contribution limits set out under RCW 42.17A.405(2) per election, or one thousand dollars if there is no statutory limit;(b) Occurred:(i) More than thirty days before an election, where the commission entered into an agreement to resolve the matter; or(ii) At any time where the violation did not constitute a material violation because it was inadvertent and minor or otherwise has been cured and, after consideration of all the circumstances, further proceedings would not serve the purposes of this chapter;(c) Does not materially harm the public interest, beyond the harm to the policy of this chapter inherent in any violation; and(d) Involved:(i) A person who:(A) Took corrective action within five business days after the commission first notified the person of noncompliance, or where the commission did not provide notice and filed a required report within twenty-one days after the report was due to be filed; and(B) Substantially met the filing deadline for all other required reports within the immediately preceding twelve-month period; or(ii) A candidate who:(A) Lost the election in question; and(B) Did not receive contributions over one hundred times the contribution limit in aggregate per election during the campaign in question.(47)(a) "Sponsor" for purposes of an electioneering communications, independent expenditures, or political advertising means the person paying for the electioneering communication, independent expenditure, or political advertising. If a person acts as an agent for another or is reimbursed by another for the payment, the original source of the payment is the sponsor.(b) "Sponsor," for purposes of a political or incidental committee, means any person, except an authorized committee, to whom any of the following applies:(i) The committee receives eighty percent or more of its contributions either from the person or from the person's members, officers, employees, or shareholders;(ii) The person collects contributions for the committee by use of payroll deductions or dues from its members, officers, or employees.(48) "Sponsored committee" means a committee, other than an authorized committee, that has one or more sponsors.(49) "State office" means state legislative office or the office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general, commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of public instruction, state auditor, or state treasurer.(50) "State official" means a person who holds a state office.(51) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the possession or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the election for which the contributions were received, and that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining debts or expenses incurred by the committee or candidate with respect to that election. In the case of a continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts or expenses when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17A.255.(52) "Technical correction" means the correction of a minor or ministerial error in a required report that does not materially harm the public interest and needs to be corrected for the report to be in full compliance with the requirements of this chapter.(53) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals appointed by a candidate or political or incidental committee, pursuant to RCW 42.17A.210, to perform the duties specified in that section.(54) "Violation" means a violation of this chapter that is not a remediable violation, minor violation, or an error classified by the commission as appropriate to address by a technical correction.Sec. 22. RCW 29B.10.270 and 2024 c 164 s 227 are each amended to read as follows:"Gift" has the definition in RCW ((42.52.010))42.52.150.Sec. 23. RCW 42.17A.615 and 2019 c 428 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any lobbyist registered under RCW 42.17A.600 and any person who lobbies shall file electronically with the commission monthly reports of the lobbyist's or person's lobbying activities. The reports shall be made in the form and manner prescribed by the commission and must be signed by the lobbyist. The monthly report shall be filed within fifteen days after the last day of the calendar month covered by the report.(2) The monthly report shall contain:(a) The totals of all expenditures for lobbying activities made or incurred by the lobbyist or on behalf of the lobbyist by the lobbyist's employer during the period covered by the report. Expenditure totals for lobbying activities shall be segregated according to financial category, including compensation; food and refreshments; living accommodations; advertising; travel; contributions; and other expenses or services. Each individual expenditure of more than twenty-five dollars for entertainment shall be identified by date, place, amount, and the names of all persons taking part in the entertainment, along with the dollar amount attributable to each person, including the lobbyist's portion.(b) In the case of a lobbyist employed by more than one employer, the proportionate amount of expenditures in each category incurred on behalf of each of the lobbyist's employers.(c) An itemized listing of each contribution of money or of tangible or intangible personal property, whether contributed by the lobbyist personally or delivered or transmitted by the lobbyist, to any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition, or for or on behalf of any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition. All contributions made to, or for the benefit of, any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition shall be identified by date, amount, and the name of the candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition receiving, or to be benefited by each such contribution.(d) The subject matter of proposed legislation or other legislative activity or rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW, the state administrative procedure act, and the state agency considering the same, which the lobbyist has been engaged in supporting or opposing during the reporting period, unless exempt under RCW 42.17A.610(2).(e) A listing of each payment for an item specified in RCW 42.52.150(((5)))(7) in excess of ((fifty dollars))$100 and each item specified in RCW ((42.52.010(9) (d) and (f)))42.52.150(1)(c) (iv) and (vi) made to a state elected official, state officer, or state employee. Each item shall be identified by recipient, date, and approximate value of the item.(f) The total expenditures paid or incurred during the reporting period by the lobbyist for lobbying purposes, whether through or on behalf of a lobbyist or otherwise, for (i) political advertising as defined in RCW 42.17A.005; and (ii) public relations, telemarketing, polling, or similar activities if the activities, directly or indirectly, are intended, designed, or calculated to influence legislation or the adoption or rejection of a rule, standard, or rate by an agency under the administrative procedure act. The report shall specify the amount, the person to whom the amount was paid, and a brief description of the activity.(3) Lobbyists are not required to report the following:(a) Unreimbursed personal living and travel expenses not incurred directly for lobbying;(b) Any expenses incurred for the lobbyist's own living accommodations;(c) Any expenses incurred for the lobbyist's own travel to and from hearings of the legislature;(d) Any expenses incurred for telephone, and any office expenses, including rent and salaries and wages paid for staff and secretarial assistance.(4) The commission may adopt rules to vary the content of lobbyist reports to address specific circumstances, consistent with this section. Lobbyist reports are subject to audit by the commission.Sec. 24. RCW 29B.50.050 and 2024 c 164 s 477 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any lobbyist registered under RCW 29B.50.010 and any person who lobbies shall file electronically with the commission monthly reports of the lobbyist's or person's lobbying activities. The reports shall be made in the form and manner prescribed by the commission and must be signed by the lobbyist. The monthly report shall be filed within 15 days after the last day of the calendar month covered by the report.(2) The monthly report shall contain:(a) The totals of all expenditures for lobbying activities made or incurred by the lobbyist or on behalf of the lobbyist by the lobbyist's employer during the period covered by the report. Expenditure totals for lobbying activities shall be segregated according to financial category, including compensation; food and refreshments; living accommodations; advertising; travel; contributions; and other expenses or services. Each individual expenditure of more than twenty-five dollars for entertainment shall be identified by date, place, amount, and the names of all persons taking part in the entertainment, along with the dollar amount attributable to each person, including the lobbyist's portion.(b) In the case of a lobbyist employed by more than one employer, the proportionate amount of expenditures in each category incurred on behalf of each of the lobbyist's employers.(c) An itemized listing of each contribution of money or of tangible or intangible personal property, whether contributed by the lobbyist personally or delivered or transmitted by the lobbyist, to any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition, or for or on behalf of any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition. All contributions made to, or for the benefit of, any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition shall be identified by date, amount, and the name of the candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition receiving, or to be benefited by each such contribution.(d) The subject matter of proposed legislation or other legislative activity or rule making under chapter 34.05 RCW, the state administrative procedure act, and the state agency considering the same, which the lobbyist has been engaged in supporting or opposing during the reporting period, unless exempt under RCW 29B.50.040(2).(e) A listing of each payment for an item specified in RCW 42.52.150(((5)))(7) in excess of ((fifty dollars))$100 and each item specified in RCW ((42.52.010(9) (d) and (f)))42.52.150(1)(c) (iv) and (vi) made to a state elected official, state officer, or state employee. Each item shall be identified by recipient, date, and approximate value of the item.(f) The total expenditures paid or incurred during the reporting period by the lobbyist for lobbying purposes, whether through or on behalf of a lobbyist or otherwise, for (i) political advertising as defined in RCW 29B.10.410; and (ii) public relations, telemarketing, polling, or similar activities if the activities, directly or indirectly, are intended, designed, or calculated to influence legislation or the adoption or rejection of a rule, standard, or rate by an agency under the administrative procedure act. The report shall specify the amount, the person to whom the amount was paid, and a brief description of the activity.(3) Lobbyists are not required to report the following:(a) Unreimbursed personal living and travel expenses not incurred directly for lobbying;(b) Any expenses incurred for the lobbyist's own living accommodations;(c) Any expenses incurred for the lobbyist's own travel to and from hearings of the legislature;(d) Any expenses incurred for telephone, and any office expenses, including rent and salaries and wages paid for staff and secretarial assistance.(4) The commission may adopt rules to vary the content of lobbyist reports to address specific circumstances, consistent with this section. Lobbyist reports are subject to audit by the commission.Sec. 25. RCW 42.17A.620 and 2010 c 204 s 805 are each amended to read as follows:(1) When a listing or a report of contributions is made to the commission under RCW 42.17A.615(2)(c), a copy of the listing or report must be given to the candidate, elected official, professional ((staff member))employee of the legislature, or officer or employee of an agency, or a political committee supporting or opposing a ballot proposition named in the listing or report.(2) If a state elected official or a member of the official's immediate family is identified by a lobbyist in a lobbyist report as having received from the lobbyist an item specified in RCW 42.52.150(((5)))(7) or ((42.52.010(10) (d) or (f)))42.52.150(1)(c) (iv) or (vi), the lobbyist shall transmit to the official a copy of the completed form used to identify the item in the report at the same time the report is filed with the commission.Sec. 26. RCW 29B.50.060 and 2024 c 164 s 478 are each amended to read as follows:(1) When a listing or a report of contributions is made to the commission under RCW 29B.50.050(2)(c), a copy of the listing or report must be given to the candidate, elected official, professional ((staff member))employee of the legislature, or officer or employee of an agency, or a political committee supporting or opposing a ballot proposition named in the listing or report.(2) If a state elected official or a member of the official's immediate family is identified by a lobbyist in a lobbyist report as having received from the lobbyist an item specified in RCW 42.52.150(((5)))(7) or ((42.52.010(9) (d) or (f)))42.52.150(1)(c) (iv) or (vi), the lobbyist shall transmit to the official a copy of the completed form used to identify the item in the report at the same time the report is filed with the commission.Sec. 27. RCW 42.17A.710 and 2023 c 462 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The statement of financial affairs required by RCW 42.17A.700 shall disclose the following information for the reporting individual and each member of the reporting individual's immediate family:(a) Occupation, name of employer, and business address;(b) Each bank account, savings account, and insurance policy in which a direct financial interest was held that exceeds twenty thousand dollars at any time during the reporting period; each other item of intangible personal property in which a direct financial interest was held that exceeds two thousand dollars during the reporting period; the name, address, and nature of the entity; and the nature and highest value of each direct financial interest during the reporting period;(c) The name and address of each creditor to whom the value of two thousand dollars or more was owed; the original amount of each debt to each creditor; the amount of each debt owed to each creditor as of the date of filing; the terms of repayment of each debt; and the security given, if any, for each such debt. Debts arising from a "retail installment transaction" as defined in chapter 63.14 RCW (retail installment sales act) need not be reported;(d) Every public or private office, directorship, and position held as trustee; except that an elected official or executive state officer need not report the elected official's or executive state officer's service on a governmental board, commission, association, or functional equivalent, when such service is part of the elected official's or executive state officer's official duties;(e) All persons for whom any legislation, rule, rate, or standard has been prepared, promoted, or opposed for current or deferred compensation. For the purposes of this subsection, "compensation" does not include payments made to the person reporting by the governmental entity for which the person serves as an elected official or state executive officer or professional staff member for the person's service in office; the description of such actual or proposed legislation, rules, rates, or standards; and the amount of current or deferred compensation paid or promised to be paid;(f) The name and address of each governmental entity, corporation, partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, association, union, or other business or commercial entity from whom compensation has been received in any form of a total value of two thousand dollars or more; the value of the compensation; and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation;(g) The name of any corporation, partnership, joint venture, association, union, or other entity in which is held any office, directorship, or any general partnership interest, or an ownership interest of ten percent or more; the name or title of that office, directorship, or partnership; the nature of ownership interest; and: (i) With respect to a governmental unit in which the official seeks or holds any office or position, if the entity has received compensation in any form during the preceding twelve months from the governmental unit, the value of the compensation and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation; and (ii) the name of each governmental unit, corporation, partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, association, union, or other business or commercial entity from which the entity has received compensation in any form in the amount of ten thousand dollars or more during the preceding twelve months and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation. As used in (g)(ii) of this subsection, "compensation" does not include payment for water and other utility services at rates approved by the Washington state utilities and transportation commission or the legislative authority of the public entity providing the service. With respect to any bank or commercial lending institution in which is held any office, directorship, partnership interest, or ownership interest, it shall only be necessary to report either the name, address, and occupation of every director and officer of the bank or commercial lending institution and the average monthly balance of each account held during the preceding twelve months by the bank or commercial lending institution from the governmental entity for which the individual is an official or candidate or professional staff member, or all interest paid by a borrower on loans from and all interest paid to a depositor by the bank or commercial lending institution if the interest exceeds two thousand four hundred dollars;(h) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ten thousand dollars in which any direct financial interest was acquired during the preceding calendar year, and a statement of the amount and nature of the financial interest and of the consideration given in exchange for that interest;(i) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ten thousand dollars in which any direct financial interest was divested during the preceding calendar year, and a statement of the amount and nature of the consideration received in exchange for that interest, and the name and address of the person furnishing the consideration;(j) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ten thousand dollars in which a direct financial interest was held. If a description of the property has been included in a report previously filed, the property may be listed, for purposes of this subsection (1)(j), by reference to the previously filed report;(k) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds twenty thousand dollars, in which a corporation, partnership, firm, enterprise, or other entity had a direct financial interest, in which corporation, partnership, firm, or enterprise a ten percent or greater ownership interest was held;(l) A list of each occasion, specifying date, donor, and amount, at which food and beverage in excess of ((fifty dollars))$100 was accepted under RCW 42.52.150(((5)))(7);(m) A list of each occasion, specifying date, donor, and amount, at which items specified in RCW ((42.52.010(9) (d) and (f)))42.52.150(1)(c) (iv) and (vi) were accepted; and(n) Such other information as the commission may deem necessary in order to properly carry out the purposes and policies of this chapter, as the commission shall prescribe by rule.(2)(a) When judges, prosecutors, sheriffs, participants in the address confidentiality program under RCW 40.24.030, or their immediate family members are required to disclose real property that is the personal residence of the judge, prosecutor, sheriff, or address confidentiality program participant, the requirements of subsection (1)(h) through (k) of this section may be satisfied for that property by substituting:(i) The city or town;(ii) The type of residence, such as a single-family or multifamily residence, and the nature of ownership; and(iii) Such other identifying information the commission prescribes by rule for the mailing address where the property is located.(b) Nothing in this subsection relieves the judge, prosecutor, or sheriff of any other applicable obligations to disclose potential conflicts or to recuse oneself.(3)(a) Where an amount is required to be reported under subsection (1)(a) through (m) of this section, it may be reported within a range as provided in (b) of this subsection.(b)Code ALess than thirty thousand dollars;Code BAt least thirty thousand dollars, but less than sixty thousand dollars;Code CAt least sixty thousand dollars, but less than one hundred thousand dollars;Code DAt least one hundred thousand dollars, but less than two hundred thousand dollars;Code EAt least two hundred thousand dollars, but less than five hundred thousand dollars;Code FAt least five hundred thousand dollars, but less than seven hundred and fifty thousand dollars;Code GAt least seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, but less than one million dollars; orCode HOne million dollars or more.(c) An amount of stock may be reported by number of shares instead of by market value. No provision of this subsection may be interpreted to prevent any person from filing more information or more detailed information than required.(4) Items of value given to an official's or employee's spouse, domestic partner, or family member are attributable to the official or employee, except the item is not attributable if an independent business, family, or social relationship exists between the donor and the spouse, domestic partner, or family member.Sec. 28. RCW 29B.55.030 and 2024 c 164 s 488 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The statement of financial affairs required by RCW 29B.55.010 shall disclose the following information for the reporting individual and each member of the reporting individual's immediate family:(a) Occupation, name of employer, and business address;(b) Each bank account, savings account, and insurance policy in which a direct financial interest was held that exceeds twenty thousand dollars at any time during the reporting period; each other item of intangible personal property in which a direct financial interest was held that exceeds two thousand dollars during the reporting period; the name, address, and nature of the entity; and the nature and highest value of each direct financial interest during the reporting period;(c) The name and address of each creditor to whom the value of two thousand dollars or more was owed; the original amount of each debt to each creditor; the amount of each debt owed to each creditor as of the date of filing; the terms of repayment of each debt; and the security given, if any, for each such debt. Debts arising from a "retail installment transaction" as defined in chapter 63.14 RCW (retail installment sales act) need not be reported;(d) Every public or private office, directorship, and position held as trustee; except that an elected official or executive state officer need not report the elected official's or executive state officer's service on a governmental board, commission, association, or functional equivalent, when such service is part of the elected official's or executive state officer's official duties;(e) All persons for whom any legislation, rule, rate, or standard has been prepared, promoted, or opposed for current or deferred compensation. For the purposes of this subsection, "compensation" does not include payments made to the person reporting by the governmental entity for which the person serves as an elected official or state executive officer or professional staff member for the person's service in office; the description of such actual or proposed legislation, rules, rates, or standards; and the amount of current or deferred compensation paid or promised to be paid;(f) The name and address of each governmental entity, corporation, partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, association, union, or other business or commercial entity from whom compensation has been received in any form of a total value of two thousand dollars or more; the value of the compensation; and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation;(g) The name of any corporation, partnership, joint venture, association, union, or other entity in which is held any office, directorship, or any general partnership interest, or an ownership interest of ten percent or more; the name or title of that office, directorship, or partnership; the nature of ownership interest; and: (i) With respect to a governmental unit in which the official seeks or holds any office or position, if the entity has received compensation in any form during the preceding twelve months from the governmental unit, the value of the compensation and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation; and (ii) the name of each governmental unit, corporation, partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, association, union, or other business or commercial entity from which the entity has received compensation in any form in the amount of ten thousand dollars or more during the preceding twelve months and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation. As used in (g)(ii) of this subsection, "compensation" does not include payment for water and other utility services at rates approved by the Washington state utilities and transportation commission or the legislative authority of the public entity providing the service. With respect to any bank or commercial lending institution in which is held any office, directorship, partnership interest, or ownership interest, it shall only be necessary to report either the name, address, and occupation of every director and officer of the bank or commercial lending institution and the average monthly balance of each account held during the preceding twelve months by the bank or commercial lending institution from the governmental entity for which the individual is an official or candidate or professional staff member, or all interest paid by a borrower on loans from and all interest paid to a depositor by the bank or commercial lending institution if the interest exceeds two thousand four hundred dollars;(h) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ten thousand dollars in which any direct financial interest was acquired during the preceding calendar year, and a statement of the amount and nature of the financial interest and of the consideration given in exchange for that interest;(i) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ten thousand dollars in which any direct financial interest was divested during the preceding calendar year, and a statement of the amount and nature of the consideration received in exchange for that interest, and the name and address of the person furnishing the consideration;(j) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds ten thousand dollars in which a direct financial interest was held. If a description of the property has been included in a report previously filed, the property may be listed, for purposes of this subsection (1)(j), by reference to the previously filed report;(k) A list, including legal or other sufficient descriptions as prescribed by the commission, of all real property in the state of Washington, the assessed valuation of which exceeds twenty thousand dollars, in which a corporation, partnership, firm, enterprise, or other entity had a direct financial interest, in which corporation, partnership, firm, or enterprise a ten percent or greater ownership interest was held;(l) A list of each occasion, specifying date, donor, and amount, at which food and beverage in excess of ((fifty dollars))$100 was accepted under RCW 42.52.150(((5)))(7);(m) A list of each occasion, specifying date, donor, and amount, at which items specified in RCW ((42.52.010(9) (d) and (f)))42.52.150(1)(c) (iv) and (vi) were accepted; and(n) Such other information as the commission may deem necessary in order to properly carry out the purposes and policies of this title, as the commission shall prescribe by rule.(2)(a) When judges, prosecutors, sheriffs, participants in the address confidentiality program under RCW 40.24.030, or their immediate family members are required to disclose real property that is the personal residence of the judge, prosecutor, sheriff, or address confidentiality program participant, the requirements of subsection (1)(h) through (k) of this section may be satisfied for that property by substituting:(i) The city or town;(ii) The type of residence, such as a single-family or multifamily residence, and the nature of ownership; and(iii) Such other identifying information the commission prescribes by rule for the mailing address where the property is located.(b) Nothing in this subsection relieves the judge, prosecutor, or sheriff of any other applicable obligations to disclose potential conflicts or to recuse oneself.(3)(a) Where an amount is required to be reported under subsection (1)(a) through (m) of this section, it may be reported within a range as provided in (b) of this subsection.(b)Code ALess than thirty thousand dollars;Code BAt least thirty thousand dollars, but less than sixty thousand dollars;Code CAt least sixty thousand dollars, but less than one hundred thousand dollars;Code DAt least one hundred thousand dollars, but less than two hundred thousand dollars;Code EAt least two hundred thousand dollars, but less than five hundred thousand dollars;Code FAt least five hundred thousand dollars, but less than seven hundred and fifty thousand dollars;Code GAt least seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, but less than one million dollars; orCode HOne million dollars or more.(c) An amount of stock may be reported by number of shares instead of by market value. No provision of this subsection may be interpreted to prevent any person from filing more information or more detailed information than required.(4) Items of value given to an official's or employee's spouse, domestic partner, or family member are attributable to the official or employee, except the item is not attributable if an independent business, family, or social relationship exists between the donor and the spouse, domestic partner, or family member.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 29. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 42.52.140 (Gifts) and 1994 c 154 s 114;(2) RCW 42.52.340 (Transfer of jurisdiction) and 1994 c 154 s 204; and(3) RCW 42.52.801 (ExemptionâSolicitation to promote tourism) and 2003 c 153 s 5.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 30. Sections 1, 9, 13, 21, 23, 25, and 27 of this act expire January 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 31. Sections 2, 10, 14, 22, 24, 26, and 28 of this act take effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---